Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2319YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 223 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the publication of 4 mental health resources and partnering with students to find 5 additional ways to increase student awareness of mental health 6 resources and information related to mental health. 7 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 8 following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 10 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the publication of 11 mental health resources and partnering with students to find 12 additional ways to increase student awareness of mental health 13 resources and information related to mental health. 14 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Mental health resources. 15 The board of directors of each school district and the 16 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 17 do all of the following: 18 1. Publish on the school districtâs or accredited nonpublic 19 schoolâs internet site the mental health resources created by 20 your life Iowa, or a link to where such mental health resources 21 may be accessed on your life Iowaâs internet site. 22 2. Partner with students enrolled in the school district or 23 accredited nonpublic school in order to find additional ways 24 to increase student awareness of mental health resources and 25 information related to mental health. 26